Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.020

Administration of chapter—Standards—Testing laboratory.

(1) This chapter shall be administered by the director or his or her authorized agent. For the purpose of administering this chapter, for motor fuel except biodiesel fuel, the standards set forth in the Annual Book of ASTM Standards and supplements thereto, and revisions thereof, are adopted, together with applicable federal environmental protection agency standards. If a conflict exists between federal environmental protection agency standards, ASTM standards, or state standards, for purposes of uniformity, federal environmental protection agency standards shall take precedence over ASTM standards. Any state standards adopted must be consistent with federal environmental protection agency standards and ASTM standards not in conflict with federal environmental protection agency standards.

(2) The director may establish a fuel testing laboratory or may contract with a laboratory for testing. The director may also adopt rules on false and misleading advertising, labeling and posting of prices, and the standards for, and identity of, motor fuels. The director shall require fuel pumps offering an ethanol blend to be identified by a label stating the percentage of ethanol and fuel pumps offering a biodiesel blend of up to and including five percent to be identified by a label that states "may contain up to five percent biodiesel." Biodiesel blends above five percent shall be identified by a label stating the percentage of biodiesel being offered.

(3) The rules adopted under RCW 19.112.140 shall also provide that the diesel refiner is responsible for meeting the ASTM standards required by chapter 338, Laws of 2006 when providing diesel fuel into the distribution system.

[ 2010 c 96 s 1; 2006 c 338 s 8; 1990 c 102 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.